Alabama, session 2026rs, SB273.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 13A-6-90.1, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§13A-6-90.1
(a) A person who, acting with an improper purpose,
intentionally and repeatedly follows, harasses, telephones, or
initiates communication, verbally, electronically, or
otherwise, with another personindividual, any member of the
other person's individual's immediate family, or any third
party with whom the other person individual is acquainted, and
causes material harm to the mental or emotional health of the
other personindividual, or causes such person the individual
to reasonably fear that his or her employment, business, or
career is threatened, and the perpetrator was previously
informed to cease that conduct is guilty of the crime of
stalking in the second degree.
(b)(1) The crime of stalking in the second degree is a
Class B misdemeanor.
(2) A second or subsequent violation is a Class C
felony."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 1

1, 2026.
SB273 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB273
Senate 24-Feb-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 09-Apr-26




By: Senator Orr
Page 2